West Virginia, session 2026, HB5686.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 31. HOPE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. §18-31-6a.  Payments. Nothwithstanding the provisions of §18-31-6(d) of this code to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2026, one quarter of the total annually required deposit into an eligible recipient’s Hope Scholarship account shall be made no later than August 15 of every year, one quarter of the total annually required deposit shall be made no later than October 15 of every year, one quarter of the total annually required deposit shall be made no later than January 15 of every year, and one quarter of the total annually required deposit shall be made no later than April 15 of every year.  The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home